Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.22.130

Rights as between individuals preserved.

The protection accorded to financial institutions under RCW 30A.22.120, 30A.22.140, 30A.22.150, 30A.22.160, 30A.22.170, 30A.22.180, 30A.22.190, 30A.22.200, 30A.22.210, and 30A.22.220 shall have no bearing on the actual rights of ownership to deposited funds by a depositor, and/or between depositors, and/or by and between beneficiaries of trust and P.O.D. accounts, and their heirs, successors, personal representatives, and assigns.

[ 2014 c 37 s 197; 1981 c 192 s 13. Formerly RCW 30.22.130.]